apertium-cat.cat.dix
<pardef n="v/enir__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>indríem</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>indria</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>indríeu</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>indries</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>indrien</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>indria</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>indrem</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>indré</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>indreu</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>indràs</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>indran</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>indrà</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>inguéssim</l> <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ingués</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>inguéssiu</l> <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>inguessis</l> <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>inguessin</l> <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="RL"><p><l>ingués</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enint</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enint</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>inguérem</l>  <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>inguí</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>inguéreu</l>  <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ingueres</l>  <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ingueren</l>  <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ingué</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>inguem</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>inguem</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eniu</l>      <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eniu</l>      <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ine</l>       <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ine</l>       <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__agafa"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>inguin</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>inguen</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>inguin</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>inguen</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ingui</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>inga</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ingui</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>inga</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enir</l>      <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>indre</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enir</l>      <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>indre</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eníem</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enia</l>      <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eníeu</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enies</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enien</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enia</l>      <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>inguéssim</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>inguérem</l> <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ingués</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>inguera</l>  <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>inguéssiu</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>inguéreu</l> <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>inguessis</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ingueres</l> <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>inguessin</l><r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ingueren</l> <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ingués</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>inguera</l>  <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ingudes</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>inguda</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>inguts</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ingut</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>enim</l>      <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>inc</l>       <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>eniu</l>      <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éns</l>       <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>énen</l>      <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>inguem</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>ingui</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>inga</l>     <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ingueu</l>    <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="cat"><p><l>inguis</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e v="val"><p><l>ingues</l>   <r>enir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="venir">           <i>v</i><par n="v/enir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="venir de gust">   <i>v</i><par n="v/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>gust</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>gust</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="venir al cas">    <i>v</i><par n="v/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>al<b/>cas</l><r><g><b/>al<b/>cas</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="venir amb romanços"><i>v</i><par n="v/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>amb<b/>romanços</l><r><g><b/>amb<b/>romanços</g></r></p></e>
<e r="RL" lm="venir de primera"><i>v</i><par n="v/enir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>de<b/>primera</l><r><g><b/>de<b/>primera</g></r></p></e>
